Hawaii statutes.
§350-5 Admissibility of evidence. The
physician-patient privilege, the psychologist-client privilege, the spousal
privilege, and the victim-counselor privilege shall not be grounds for
excluding evidence in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report of child
abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter. [L 1967, c 261, §6; HRS §350-5; am L
1987, c 204, §8; am L 1992, c 217, §3]

Cross References

Physician-patient privilege, see §626-1, rule 504.

Psychologist-client privilege, see §626-1, rule 504.1.

Spousal privilege, see §626-1, rule 505.

Victim-counselor privilege, see §626-1, rule 505.5.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next